Vermont, session 2025-2026, H402.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 1722 is amended to read:
§ 1722. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(12) “Municipal employee” means any employee of a municipal
employer, including a municipal school employee or a professional employee
as defined in subdivision 1502(11) of this title, except:
VT LEG #380999 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.402
2025 Page 2 of 2
(A) elected officials, board and commission members, and executive
officers;
(B) individuals employed as supervisors as defined by section 1502
of this title; [Repealed.]
(C) individuals who have been employed on a probationary status;
(D) confidential employees as defined in this section;
(E) certified employees of school districts, except as otherwise
provided in section 1735 of this title.
* * *
(22) “Municipal public safety employee” means a municipal employee
who is:
(A) a firefighter as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 3151(3);
(B) an ambulance service, emergency medical personnel, or first
responder service as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2651; or
(C) a law enforcement officer who has been certified by the Vermont
Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358; or
(D) support staff in a public safety department.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380999 v.1